Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Chapter 5

Wildlife Preserves and Restoration Projects

70-5-101. Establishment of hunting areas, refuges, and wildlife management areas — Prohibited acts.

The wildlife resources agency has the power and authority to establish, with the consent of the property owner, public hunting areas, refuges, or wildlife management areas, wherever it deems necessary or feasible for the protection, propagation and management of wildlife, or any of these.

It is unlawful to hunt, kill, destroy, trap, ensnare, or molest in any manner any wildlife within such areas or to trespass on such areas, except as provided by proclamation or rule or regulation. Such areas shall be posted in conspicuous places. The executive director is authorized to issue permits for the destruction of predatory wildlife within such areas.

A violation of subdivision (b)(1) is a Class C misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding subsection (b), a person with a handgun carry permit pursuant to § 39-17-1351 may possess a handgun the entire year while on the premises of any refuge, public hunting area or wildlife management area or, to the extent permitted by federal law, national forest land maintained by the state. Nothing in this subsection (c) shall authorize a person to use any handgun to hunt unless the person is in full compliance with all wildlife laws, rules and regulations.

Nothing in this section shall authorize a person with a hand gun carry permit to possess such weapon in the portion of any refuge, public hunting area or wildlife management area that is within the boundaries of a state park or state natural area unless otherwise authorized in accordance with state law.

Nothing in this section shall authorize a person to access any area unless the person is in full compliance with all current wildlife laws, rules, proclamations and regulations.

Subject to existing rights, lands managed by the wildlife resources agency shall be open to access and use for recreational hunting and fishing, except as limited by the agency for reasons of public safety, homeland security, or as otherwise limited by law.

For the purposes of this subsection (f), lands managed by the agency include lands owned by the agency, as well as lands owned by other public entities for which the agency regulates hunting and fishing.

The agency shall exercise its authority to manage lands in a manner to support, promote and enhance recreational hunting and fishing opportunities to the extent authorized by law.

The agency is not required to give preference to hunting and fishing over other uses or priorities established by state law.

Agency decisions and actions shall not result in any net loss of any acreage available for hunting and fishing opportunities.

Prior to January 1, 2008, and each January 1 thereafter, the agency shall submit to the chair of the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives and the chair of the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate a written report containing:

The estimated acreage managed by the agency that has been closed to recreational hunting and fishing during the previous fiscal year and the reasons for the closures;

The estimated acreage managed by the agency that was opened to recreational hunting and fishing to compensate for the estimated acreage that was closed during the previous fiscal year; and

The estimated acreage of new public hunting and fishing lands added to the existing hunting and fishing lands base since the previous report.

When lands owned by the agency are closed to hunting or fishing, the agency shall mitigate the closure by opening new lands to be used for the same purpose, within twelve (12) months of closure. The managed lands to be opened shall be at least equal to the acreage of lands closed by the agency and shall be located in the same grand division of the state in which the closed lands are located. The agency shall not be responsible for mitigation of land closures when lands not owned by the agency are removed from the agency's control or closed to hunting and fishing by the owning entity.

The agency is exempt from this subsection (c) when closing or utilizing acreages of public hunting and fishing lands for the following purposes:

Firearm and archery shooting ranges;

Road development and maintenance;

Service buildings;

Administrative buildings;

Creation of agency lakes;

Agency project-related parking;

Establishment of wildlife refuges; and

Development and maintenance of a proposed or existing greenway connecting Davidson, Wilson and Rutherford counties on land that is owned by the Nashville district of the United States army corps of engineers.

This subsection (f) shall have no effect on the agency's authority or ability to regulate hunting and fishing, including its ability to set season times and lengths, and bag limits.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 56; 1953, ch. 255, § 4 (Williams, § 5178.85); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; 1982, ch. 738, § 32; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-601; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 891, § 21; 2007, ch. 87, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 606, § 2; 2012, ch. 604, § 23; 2013, ch. 236, § 11.

Cross-References. General assembly empowered to protect game and fish, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 13.

Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

State forester cooperating with director in establishing game refuge or preserve, § 11-4-803.

Wetlands, title 11, ch. 14, part 4.

70-5-102. Acquisition of property — Authority of agency.

The wildlife resources agency is authorized and empowered to acquire by purchase, gift, lease or otherwise, and to hold title to, in the name of the state of Tennessee, lands and waters to be known as the state wildlife preserves, and also is authorized to execute on behalf of the state valid and binding contracts, for the purchase, sale and lease of such wildlife preserves as are deemed for the best interest of the state in establishing a system of state wildlife preserves.

The agency is hereby expressly authorized to pay out of the wildlife resources fund the pro rata part of any current real property taxes due and owing on any real property that the commission may acquire by purchase or otherwise for the calendar year in which such property may be acquired.

The agency shall not construct or authorize the construction of dikes, dams, levees, or other artificial structures on preserve property in such a way as to cause flooding on adjacent private lands or to restrict natural drainage of private lands through such preserves. Affected landowners may seek injunctive relief to enforce these provisions and prevent harm to their properties.

The agency, in acquiring property adjacent to Reelfoot Lake and the state lands surrounding it, may proceed to acquire such lands under title 29, chapter 17, parts 7 and 8, in order to expedite the acquisition of the title to such lands.

Acts 1937, ch. 252, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 50, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.13 (Williams, § 5176.6); Acts 1959, ch. 126, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 9; 1974, ch. 481, § 21; modified; 1975, ch. 213, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-602; Acts 1985, ch. 350, § 5.

Cross-References. Reelfoot Lake land acquisition, §§ 11-14-116, 70-1-302, 70-2-219.

70-5-103. Acquisition of delinquent tax lands.

The agency or its authorized representatives are empowered and authorized to examine delinquent tax lists in the hands of the trustees of the various counties of the state, as well as the commissioner of revenue, and shall cooperate with the county trustees, the commissioner of revenue, or any back tax attorneys, in obtaining the sale of land and waters that, in its opinion, are suitable for state wildlife preserves, and shall cooperate with the governor in acquiring title to such lands and waters in the name of the state and the dedication of the lands and waters as state wildlife preserves.

Acts 1937, ch. 252, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 50, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.13 (Williams, § 5176.6); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-603.

70-5-104. Payment for lands and waters — Procedure upon default.

In acquiring lands and waters for wildlife preserves and in executing contracts for the purchase, sale, or lease of such state wildlife preserves, as provided for in §§ 70-1-302(a) and (b), 70-5-102 and 70-5-103, the agency is authorized to acquire and pay for such lands and waters in the name of the state over a period of years, and is authorized to execute promissory notes as evidence of the deferred payments, such notes in no event to bear interest in excess of three percent (3%) per annum, but shall incur no personal liability by reason of the execution of such deferred purchase money notes.

In the event the state defaults in the payment of such purchase money notes, the holder or holders of vendors' liens to secure the payment of the purchase price shall have a right to bring a proceeding in rem in a court of competent jurisdiction for the purpose of enforcing such vendors' liens and acquiring title to the property, but in no event shall the holder of such vendors' liens or deferred notes have a right to obtain a deficiency judgment against the state or any state official.

Acts 1939, ch. 162, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 50, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.13 (Williams, § 5176.6); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 5, 22; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-604.

70-5-105. Dedication of property for preserves by governor.

The governor is authorized and empowered to designate and set apart suitable lands and waters that have or may hereafter revert to and become the property of the state on account of delinquent taxes, or any lands or waters held or that may be given to the state by donation or otherwise, and, in the governor's discretion and judgment, shall, by public proclamation, set apart and dedicate such lands and waters for wildlife preserves and declare the establishment of such preserves and fix the limits of the lands and waters for state wildlife preserves.

Acts 1937, ch. 252, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.13 (Williams, § 5176.6); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-605.

70-5-106. Establishment of fish preserves — Powers of commission — Penalty for violations.

The fish and wildlife commission has the power and authority, in its discretion, to set aside waters within the jurisdiction of the state as fish preserves in which it is unlawful to take, catch or kill fish, or to attempt to do so, except as provided in this section.

Upon the establishment of such fish preserves, notices of such establishment shall be inserted once in a newspaper regularly published in each of the counties in which such designated waters are located, or if there be no newspaper published in any such county, the notice of such establishment shall be once inserted in a newspaper published in the county nearest to which such waters are located.

The commission has the power and authority to close the waters against fishing of all kinds, and to reopen the same for fishing when it deems the water has been closed a sufficient time for restocking.

Notices of the establishment of such fish preserves shall also be posted in conspicuous places surrounding or along the route of the waters designated.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 21 (Williams, § 5178.50); Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-606; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Cross-References. Exotic animals, title 70, ch. 4, part 4.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-5-107. Construction and maintenance of state parks — Reelfoot Lake facilities — Wildlife management areas designated — Penalty for violations.

The supervision and control over all, or any part, of the lands belonging to the state and vested in this chapter in the executive director, with the exception of such lands as may have been or may hereafter be acquired by the use of federal aid funds, may, at any time hereafter, be transferred by the wildlife resources agency, with the approval of the governor and the commissioner of environment and conservation, to the division of parks and recreation, for the purpose of constructing and maintaining state parks.

In the event of any such transfer, the agency may retain joint use of any office buildings or facilities situated on such lands as may be transferred and necessary for its use.

The commissioner of environment and conservation has the same power and authority to grant leases of property transferred to the department of environment and conservation upon the same conditions and terms as provided in this chapter for the executive director.

Leases executed under this section shall be approved by the governor and the attorney general and reporter.

Prior to the construction of any facility or improvement on state lands at Reelfoot Lake, the plans and specifications for the construction shall be presented to the department or agency having jurisdiction over the lands, which shall authorize such construction as is deemed appropriate, and such authorization shall be evidenced by written supplements to the leases. The executive director, under the supervision of the agency, is authorized to permit the construction, maintenance, and operation of facilities deemed necessary for the best utilization of Reelfoot Lake in the public interest, such facilities or developments to include, but not be limited to, boat docks, fishing piers, camp sites, trailer camps, picnic areas, hotels, motels, restaurants, fish markets and other retail stores, and to grant leases of lands for a period of twenty (20) years or less upon such terms and for such purposes as may be deemed reasonable in the public interest. The leases may contain a provision giving the lessee the option of renewing the lease upon like terms and conditions and for the same term. The leaseholds may be sold; provided, that the sale has been approved by the executive director, the governor, and the attorney general and reporter, but a sale made without their approval shall be void. Furthermore, the executive director has the power to remove any person or persons, at any time, from any of the islands or other lands on Reelfoot Lake belonging to the state who fail to observe the laws, rules and regulations governing the islands or waters of the lake, or who violate any of the provisions of any agreement or lease entered into with the executive director. All revenues collected pursuant to such leases by the agency shall be set aside by the agency to be used exclusively for habitat and resource development at Reelfoot Lake.

All lands owned in fee simple by the state of Tennessee or by condemnation or by lease, surrounding the waters of, or which are surrounded by, the waters of Reelfoot Lake, are hereby designated as a state wildlife management area, except for those properties operated by the division of parks and recreation, as the Reelfoot Lake state resort park, including noncontiguous day use areas, and consisting of approximately two hundred seventy-nine and twenty-three hundredths (279.23) acres.

It is hereby declared that the ordinary high water mark of Reelfoot Lake is two hundred eighty-five feet (285') mean sea level.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, exclusive control over the water level in Reelfoot Lake is hereby vested in the executive director.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, §§ 54, 56; 1953, ch. 255, § 4 (Williams, §§ 5178.83, 5178.85); 1955, ch. 59, § 1; 1955, ch. 205, § 1; 1957, ch. 28, § 1; 1957, ch. 169, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-607; Acts 1984, ch. 540, § 1; 1984, ch. 548, § 5; 1985, ch. 350, §§ 9, 11; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Reelfoot Lake, water management, § 70-5-113.

Attorney General Opinions. Regulation of waterfowl blinds on Reelfoot Lake, OAG 97-152, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 195 (11/05/97).

70-5-108. Acquisition of game and fish rights on private property — Nature of rights acquired — Penalty for violations.

The executive director is authorized and empowered to acquire by gift, devise, lease, purchase or otherwise the exclusive game and fish rights on any privately owned lands or waters in this state, which game and fish rights shall include the right to manage, administer, protect, stock, and propagate wild birds, wild animals and fish upon these areas, and the right to permit hunting and fishing upon these areas in accordance with rules and regulations proclaimed by the commission.

Any violation of such rules and regulations proclaimed by the commission is a Class C misdemeanor.

The game and fish rights authorized to be acquired in this section shall be acquired for any period of years that the private owner may agree to by appropriate instruments in writing, signed and acknowledged by the owner or owners of the areas, and the executive director is hereby authorized to have these leases duly recorded in the office of the register of deeds for the county or counties in which the land is located.

Acts 1941, ch. 103, §§ 1, 2; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5193.4, 5193.5 (Williams, §§ 5193.3, 5193.4); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7, 17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-613, 51-614; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of the Tennessee Law of Administration Procedure (George S. Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339.

70-5-109. Posting notices of rules and regulations.

Before any rules and regulations proclaimed by the fish and wildlife commission relative to such game and fish rights become effective, there shall be posted printed notices in prominent places and at adequate intervals around the boundary line of the area on which such game and fish rights have been acquired; provided, that the fact that one (1) or more notices have been torn down or removed after having been posted in accordance with this section shall not constitute an excuse or defense for a violation of such rules and regulations.

Acts 1941, ch. 103, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 5193.6 (Williams, § 5193.5); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 7, 17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-615; Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

70-5-110. Release or sublet of rights secured.

The executive director, or the executive director's successor, is empowered to release or sublet the rights secured from private individuals to any other public agency of the state or federal government for management purposes.

Acts 1941, ch. 103, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 5193.7 (Williams, § 5193.6); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-616.

70-5-111. Federal wildlife refuges within state — Federal aid for wildlife and fish restoration and management projects.

For the purpose of more effectively cooperating with the United States, the governor and the executive director concurring, in the acquisition, development and maintenance of refuges for migratory waterfowl and other wildlife, consent is granted to the United States, to acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift, lease or exchange, lands and waters within this state that the secretary of the interior may deem necessary and suitable in furtherance of the Migratory Bird Treaty, the Migratory Bird Treaty Act (16 U.S.C. § 703 et seq.), and the Migratory Bird Conservation Act (16 U.S.C. § 715 et seq.); provided, that the jurisdiction of the state, both civil and criminal, over persons upon areas acquired and privately owned property on areas acquired shall not be affected or changed by reason of the acquisition and administration of such areas by the United States, as migratory waterfowl and other wildlife reservations, except so far as the punishment for offenses against the United States is concerned; and provided further, that nothing in this section is intended to interfere with the operation of the game laws of this state, applying to migratory game birds, insofar as such game laws do not permit what is forbidden by federal law.

The state of Tennessee reserves the right to tax persons and corporations, their franchise and property on land or lands deeded or conveyed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) and to tax sales of gasoline and other motor vehicle fuels and oil for use in motor vehicles or other means of transportation or any other privileges, trade or business conducted on such lands and to tax and control motor vehicles or other means of transportation using any highways constructed by the United States on such lands as a result of its improvements within the state.

The state of Tennessee assents to the act of congress entitled “An act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in wildlife restoration projects, and for other purposes,” approved September 2, 1937, Public Law 415, 75th Congress; ch. 899, 50 Stat. 917 (16 U.S.C. § 669 et seq.), and the agency is authorized, empowered, and directed to perform such acts as may be necessary to the conduct and establishment of cooperative wildlife restoration projects, as defined in that act of congress, in compliance with that act and rules and regulations promulgated by the secretary of the interior under that act.

The state of Tennessee assents to the provision of the act of congress entitled: “An act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in fish restoration and management projects, and for other purposes”, approved August 9, 1950, Public Law 681, 81st Congress; ch. 685, 64 Stat. 430 (16 U.S.C. § 777 et seq.), and the agency is hereby authorized, empowered and directed to perform such acts as may be necessary to the conduct and establishment of cooperative fisheries, restoration, management, developmental and research projects, as defined in that act of congress in compliance with that act and rules and regulations promulgated by the secretary of interior under that act. No funds accruing to the state of Tennessee from license fees paid by fishers shall be diverted for any purposes other than the administration of the game and fish conservation purposes of the agency.

Acts 1937, ch. 73, § (a); Acts 1939, ch. 163, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5193.1 — 5193.3; modified; Acts 1951, ch. 101, § 1 (Williams, § 5201.13); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-609 — 51-612; Acts 1984, ch. 844, §§ 1-3.

70-5-112. Definitions — Reelfoot Lake — Diversion of water.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Entity of state or local government” means each department, commission, board, agency, council, utility district, drainage district, levee district, or other governmental unit or body created constitutionally or by enactment or action of state government, local government, or any subdivision of state or local government;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, firm, corporation, or association;

“Project” means any activity, operation, construction, building, structure, facility, or installation from which there is or may be the discharge of water; and

“Water” means any and all water, public or private, on or beneath the surface of the ground, which is contained within, flows through, or borders upon the watershed of Reelfoot Lake or any portion of Reelfoot Lake, except those bodies of water confined to and retained within the limits of private property in single ownership that do not combine or effect a junction with natural surface, subsurface, or underground waters.

Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, without the prior written approval of the executive director of the agency, or the executive director's designee, no official, employee, or agent of any entity of state or local government, nor any other person, shall authorize, undertake, or engage in any activity, practice, or project that has or is likely to have the effect of diverting surface or subsurface water that would otherwise flow into Reelfoot Lake. Furthermore, without such prior written approval, no such official, employee, or agent, nor any other person, shall authorize, undertake, or engage in any activity, practice, or project that has or is likely to have the effect of draining or otherwise removing water from Reelfoot Lake. The executive director shall promulgate rules, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, that establish procedures for obtaining such approval and that delineate the circumstances and conditions, if any, under which such diversion, drainage, or removal may be permitted without detrimental impact upon the management, protection, preservation, or enhancement of Reelfoot Lake or its fish, waterfowl, and wildlife populations and habitats.

Each violation of this section constitutes a Class C misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00). Any violation that continues into a successive day shall be regarded as a separate offense.

Acts 1986, ch. 670, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

70-5-113. Reelfoot Lake — Water levels — Water level management plan.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Free” means the flow of water not under control, able to move in any direction, and not held or confined by an artificial gate or structure;

“Lake” means a standing body of open water that occurs in a natural depression fed by one (1) or more streams from which a stream may flow, that occurs due to the widening or natural blockage or cutoff of a river or stream, or that occurs in an isolated natural depression that is not a part of a surface river or stream. “Lake” also includes a standing body of open water created by artificially blocking or restricting the flow of a river or stream;

“Natural ordinary high water mark” means the line on the shore established by the fluctuations of water and indicated by physical characteristics such as a clear, natural line impressed on the bank, trees, shelving, changes in the character of the soil, destruction of terrestrial vegetation, the presence of litter and debris, or other appropriate means that consider the characteristics of the surrounding areas;

“Natural ordinary low water mark” means the line that constitutes the usual and common or ordinary stage of the river or lake, when the volume of water is not increased by rains or freshets, nor diminished below such usual stage or volume by long continued drought to extreme low water mark; and

“Navigable” means capable, in the ordinary stage of the water, of navigation ascending and descending, by such vessels as are employed in the ordinary purposes of commerce, whether foreign or inland, and whether steam or sail vessels.

Notwithstanding this section or any law or regulation to the contrary, as first established by the Reelfoot Lake commission of 1925, it is hereby declared that the natural water levels of the navigable stream Reelfoot Lake are as follows:

The natural ordinary low water mark is two hundred eighty-two and four-tenths feet (282.4') mean sea level, which is also the top of the twenty (20) floodgates at the Reelfoot Lake spillway dam;

The natural full pool level is two hundred eighty-three and six-tenths feet (283.6') mean sea level; and

The natural ordinary high water mark is two hundred eighty-five feet (285') mean sea level.

Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, there is hereby established the water level management plan for Reelfoot Lake. The waters of Reelfoot Lake shall flow freely or naturally across the top of the twenty (20) stoplog gates or floodgates at the Reelfoot Lake spillway dam until the lake reaches an elevation of two hundred eighty-three and six-tenths feet (283.6') mean sea level. Once the lake exceeds such natural full pool level, the twenty (20) stoplog gates or floodgates at the Reelfoot Lake spillway dam shall be opened to bring the lake back to its natural full pool level of two hundred eighty-three and six-tenths feet (283.6') mean sea level. In bringing the lake back to its natural full pool level, the Reelfoot Lake Barr fishway, or radial water control spillway, may also be used.

The water management plan established in subsection (c) shall remain in effect until a fifty (50) year comprehensive management plan for Reelfoot Lake is developed by the executive director of the agency and until enactment of such legislation as shall be necessary to implement such management plan.

The general assembly hereby expresses its general approval of the fifty (50) year comprehensive management plan for Reelfoot Lake developed by the executive director as required by subsection (d), and the agency is authorized and directed to promulgate the plan, or a similar fifty (50) year comprehensive management plan, as a rule in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. Upon the effective date of such rule, the management plan contained in the rule shall supersede subsection (c) and any other subsections of this section that may be in conflict with the rule.

Acts 1986, ch. 670, § 2; 1989, ch. 369, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Reelfoot Lake, construction and improvements, § 70-5-107.